Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1070
Temporary license; general requirements.

An individual making application for a temporary license, other than a temporary license issued as provided in section 38-129.01, shall meet, and present to the department evidence of meeting, the requirements for the specific type of license applied for.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 60;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-399;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 332;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 45;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 21.